Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2138.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6143. Negligent marketing.(a) Action prohibited.--It is unlawful for a person to bring an action for negligent marketing against a manufacturer or seller unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The negligent marketing directly targeted individuals who are legally prohibited from owning firearms.(2) The negligent marketing encouraged or facilitated the unlawful use of firearms.(3) There is a direct and substantial causal link between the negligent marketing and the harm suffered by the plaintiff.123456789101112131415161718 (4) The manufacturer or seller willfully and knowingly violated a regulatory statute that proximately caused harm to the person.(b) Dismissal required.--The court shall dismiss an action brought in violation of subsection (a) and shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred by a party defending the claim.(c) Counterclaim and right of action.--(1) A manufacturer or seller harmed by an action brought by a person in violation of subsection (a) may bring a counterclaim or a separate action for damages and injunctive relief against the person.(2) A manufacturer or seller who prevails in a counterclaim or separate action brought under this subsection shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees and costs.(d) Construction.--This section shall be strictly construed.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Firearm." As defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(3) (relating to definitions)."Manufacturer." A person engaged in the business of manufacturing firearms or ammunition for sale or distribution."Negligent marketing." An advertising, promotion or marketing practice by a manufacturer or seller that directly poses a foreseeable and substantial risk of harm to a purchaser of the manufacturer's or seller's firearm or ammunition or to specific identifiable individuals."Regulatory statute." As follows:20260HB2138PN2763 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Federal or State statute that:(i) explicitly regulates firearms or ammunition; and(ii) provides clear and concrete duties that a manufacturer or seller must meet.(2) The term does not include a consumer protection law or public nuisance law of this Commonwealth."Seller." A person engaged in the business of selling firearms or ammunition at wholesale or retail.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2138PN2763 - 3 - 123456789